Hawaii, session 2025, SB787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a need for a statewide "warm line" to provide nonclinical mental health support over the telephone for non-emergency situations.  A "warm line" is a confidential, free phone service offering mental health support to individuals who are experiencing psychological distress but are not actively in danger of harming themselves or others. A mental health warm line differs from a mental health crisis line or hotline.  A crisis line or hotline generally provides services to individuals who require immediate assistance from a licensed professional, safety planning, or a referral to a secondary agency or care provider.  A mental health warm line is intended for callers who need someone to talk to but who are not actively in crisis and do not need to go to the emergency room or call 911.  A warm line is typically staffed by volunteers or paid peers who have personal experience with mental health disorders. The legislature also finds that the department of health established a warm line that is separate from the Hawaiʻi CARES 988 crisis line to assist the Maui community following the 2023 Maui wildfires, and that there exists a gap in the available mental health system in the State that necessitates the establishment of a statewide warm line. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of health to establish and operate a free statewide mental health warm line. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the equipment, training, and operational expenses necessary to establish and operate a mental health warm line that is available statewide at no cost to users. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________